Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3202.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-35-4.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-35 entitled
"Administrative Procedures" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-35-4.1. Refiling of rules and regulations Confirmation of effective rules and
regulations.
(a) Each agency shall, on or before January 2, 2002 on the first Tuesday in January of every
successive fifth year, according to a schedule and process specified by the secretary of state, file
with the secretary of state an electronic list of notice listing all its lawfully adopted rules that are in
force on the date of the filing said notice attesting that all its lawfully adopted rules have been
reviewed by the agency and thereby confirm all its lawfully adopted rules shall remain effective as
previously promulgated. Notwithstanding the electronic notice and the filing thereof as prescribed
in this section, any adoption, amendment, repeal, or other promulgation activity, as defined in § 42-
35-1, shall be undertaken only in accordance with the rulemaking process set forth in this chapter.
(b) Each agency shall give notice thirty (30) days prior to refiling any rule or regulation in
order to comply with this section. Each agency shall also give notice, thirty (30) days prior to that
agency’s due date for refiling, of which rules and regulations it shall not be refiling. The notices
shall include a statement of the intended action and a description of the subjects and issues involved.
The public notice of the refile shall be provided to all persons who have made timely request of the
agency for advance notice of its rulemaking proceedings, and published in a newspaper, or

newspapers, having aggregate general circulation throughout the state.
(c) Agency compliance with this section shall be coordinated in accordance with a schedule
established by the secretary of state for agency refiling of rules.
SECTION 2. Section 42-35-4.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-35 entitled
"Administrative Procedures" is hereby repealed.
42-35-4.2. Periodic refiling of rules and regulations.
All rules on file with the secretary of state pursuant to § 42-35-4.1 shall be refiled on the
first Tuesday in January 2007 and on the first Tuesday in January of every successive fifth year.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006161
========
LC006161 - Page 2 of 3